Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-729.01
Hall of Fame Trust Fund; created; use; investment.

There is hereby created the Hall of Fame Trust Fund to be administered by the Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission for the purpose of the creation, design, size, configuration, and placement of busts or other appropriate objects as authorized in section 72-729. Deposits to such fund shall include money received from public donation and from funds appropriated specifically for such purpose by the Legislature. The State Treasurer shall transfer ten thousand dollars from the General Fund to the Hall of Fame Trust Fund annually beginning with fiscal year 2021-22, between July 1 and July 30 of each year, on such date as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services, except that if the balance of the Hall of Fame Trust Fund exceeds fifty thousand dollars on the last day of the preceding fiscal year, such transfer shall not take place. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1973, LB 282, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 8;

Laws 2021, LB384, § 13;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 16.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.